New Jersey, session 221, A4538.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a public institution of higher education shall not increase the institutions resident undergraduate tuition rates for any academic year by more than two percent over the institutions resident undergraduate tuition rates for the prior academic year. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment.